hu: Európai kard történelmi korszaka: Ókor/Klasszikus kor; Kortárs / Modern másolat; Kora középkor; Kora újkor; Érett középkor; Késő középkor; Népvándorlás kora; Napóleoni korszak; Reneszánsz; Viktoriánus kor; Viking kor; I. világháború kora; II. világháború kora; Egyéb
it: Periodo storico della spada europea: Antichità/Età classica; Riproduzione contemporanea/moderna; Alto Medioevo; Prima età moderna; Pieno Medioevo; Tardo Medioevo; Periodo delle migrazioni; Epoca napoleonica; Rinascimento; Epoca vittoriana; Epoca vichinga; Prima guerra mondiale; Seconda guerra mondiale; Altro
pl: Okres historyczny miecza europejskiego: Starożytność / antyk; Współczesna/nowoczesna reprodukcja; Wczesne średniowiecze; Wczesna nowożytność; Pełne średniowiecze; Późne średniowiecze; Okres wędrówek ludów; Epoka napoleońska; Renesans; Epoka wiktoriańska; Epoka wikingów; Okres I wojny światowej; Okres II wojny światowej; Inne
hr-HR: Povijesno razdoblje europskog mača: Antika/klasično doba; Suvremena/moderna reprodukcija; Rani srednji vijek; Rani novi vijek; Razvijeni srednji vijek; Kasni srednji vijek; Razdoblje seobe naroda; Napoleonovo doba; Renesansa; Viktorijansko doba; Vikinško doba; Prvi svjetski rat; Drugi svjetski rat; Ostalo
ro-RO: Perioada istorică a sabiei europene: Antică/Clasică; Reproducere contemporană/modernă; Evul Mediu Timpuriu; Epoca Modernă Timpurie; Evul Mediu Mijlociu; Evul Mediu Târziu; Perioada migrațiilor; Epoca napoleoniană; Renaștere; Epoca victoriană; Epoca vikingă; Epoca Primului Război Mondial; Epoca celui de-Al Doilea Război Mondial; Altele
nl: Europees zwaard historische periode: Oudheid/Klassiek; Hedendaagse/moderne reproductie; Vroege Middeleeuwen; Vroegmodern; Hoge Middeleeuwen; Late Middeleeuwen; Grote Volksverhuizing; Napoleontische tijd; Renaissance; Victoriaans tijdperk; Vikingtijd; Tijdperk Eerste Wereldoorlog; Tijdperk Tweede Wereldoorlog; Overig
cs: Historické období, ze kterého je evropský meč: Starověk/antika; Současná/moderní reprodukce; Raný středověk; Raný novověk; Vrcholný středověk; Pozdní středověk; Doba stěhování národů; Napoleonská éra; Renesance; Viktoriánská éra; Doba vikinská; Období 1. světové války; Období 2. světové války; Ostatní
ko: 유럽 검의 역사적 시대 구분: 고대/고전 시대; 현대 복제품; 중세 초기; 근세; 중세 전성기; 중세 후기; 민족 대이동기; 나폴레옹 시대; 르네상스; 빅토리아 시대; 바이킹 시대; 제1차 세계 대전 시대; 제2차 세계 대전 시대; 기타
da: Europæiske sværds historiske periode: Antikken/klassisk; Moderne reproduktion; Tidlig middelalder; Tidlig moderne; Højmiddelalder; Senmiddelalder; Folkevandringstid; Napoleonsk tid; Renæssance; Victoriansk tid; Vikingetid; 1. verdenskrig; 2. verdenskrig; Andet
pt-BR: Período histórico da espada europeia: Antiguidade/Clássico; Reprodução contemporânea/moderna; Alta Idade Média; Início da Idade Moderna; Plena Idade Média; Baixa Idade Média; Período das Migrações; Era Napoleônica; Renascimento; Era Vitoriana; Era Viking; Era da Primeira Guerra Mundial; Era da Segunda Guerra Mundial; Outro
lt-LT: Europietiško kalavijo istorinis laikotarpis: Antika / klasikinis laikotarpis; Šiuolaikinė / moderni reprodukcija; Ankstyvieji viduramžiai; Ankstyvieji naujieji laikai; Brandieji viduramžiai; Vėlyvieji viduramžiai; Tautų kraustymosi epocha; Napoleono epocha; Renesansas; Viktorijos epocha; Vikingų amžius; Pirmojo pasaulinio karo epocha; Antrojo pasaulinio karo epocha; Kita
sl-SI: Zgodovinsko obdobje evropskega meča: Antika/klasična doba; Sodobna/moderna reprodukcija; Zgodnji srednji vek; Zgodnji novi vek; Visoki srednji vek; Pozni srednji vek; Obdobje preseljevanja ljudstev; Napoleonova doba; Renesansa; Viktorijanska doba; Vikinška doba; Obdobje prve svetovne vojne; Obdobje druge svetovne vojne; Drugo
ru: Исторический период европейского меча: Античность/Классический период; Современная копия/репродукция; Раннее Средневековье; Раннее Новое время; Высокое Средневековье; Позднее Средневековье; Эпоха Великого переселения народов; Наполеоновская эпоха; Эпоха Возрождения; Викторианская эпоха; Эпоха викингов; Эпоха Первой мировой войны; Эпоха Второй мировой войны; Другое
vi: Thời kỳ lịch sử kiếm châu Âu: Cổ đại/Cổ điển; Đương đại/Bản sao hiện đại; Sơ kỳ Trung cổ; Cận đại; Trung kỳ Trung cổ; Hậu kỳ Trung cổ; Thời kỳ Di cư; Thời kỳ Napoléon; Thời kỳ Phục hưng; Thời kỳ Victoria; Thời đại Viking; Thời kỳ Chiến tranh thế giới thứ nhất; Thời kỳ Chiến tranh thế giới thứ hai; Khác
zh-CN: 欧洲剑的历史时期: 古代/古典时期; 当代/现代复刻版; 中世纪早期; 近代早期; 中世纪盛期; 中世纪晚期; 大迁徙时期; 拿破仑时代; 文艺复兴时期; 维多利亚时代; 维京时代; 第一次世界大战时期; 第二次世界大战时期; 其他
th: ยุคประวัติศาสตร์ของดาบยุโรป: ยุคโบราณ/คลาสสิก; ของจำลองร่วมสมัย/สมัยใหม่; ยุคกลางตอนต้น; ยุคใหม่ตอนต้น; ยุคกลางตอนกลาง; ยุคกลางตอนปลาย; ยุคการย้ายถิ่นฐาน; ยุคนโปเลียน; ยุคเรเนสซองส์; ยุควิกตอเรีย; ยุคไวกิ้ง; ยุคสงครามโลกครั้งที่ 1; ยุคสงครามโลกครั้งที่ 2; อื่นๆ
es: Período histórico de espada europea: Antigua/clásica; Reproducción contemporánea/moderna; Alta Edad Media; Edad Moderna temprana; Plena Edad Media; Baja Edad Media; Período de las migraciones; Época napoleónica; Renacimiento; Época victoriana; Época vikinga; Época de la Primera Guerra Mundial; Época de la Segunda Guerra Mundial; Otro
ja: ヨーロッパの剣の歴史時代: 古代/古典期; 現代/近代のレプリカ; 中世前期; 近世; 中世盛期; 中世後期; 民族移動時代; ナポレオン時代; ルネサンス; ヴィクトリア時代; ヴァイキング時代; 第一次世界大戦期; 第二次世界大戦期; その他
fr: Période historique de l’épée européenne: Antiquité/Classique; Reproduction contemporaine/moderne; Haut Moyen Âge; Époque moderne; Moyen Âge central; Moyen Âge tardif; Période des migrations; Époque napoléonienne; Renaissance; Époque victorienne; Âge des Vikings; Époque de la Première Guerre mondiale; Époque de la Seconde Guerre mondiale; Autre
fi: Eurooppalaisen miekan historiallinen ajanjakso: Antiikki/klassinen; Nykyaikainen/moderni jäljennös; Varhaiskeskiaika; Varhaismoderni; Sydänkeskiaika; Myöhäiskeskiaika; Kansainvaellusaika; Napoleonin aika; Renessanssi; Viktoriaaninen aika; Viikinkiaika; Ensimmäisen maailmansodan aika; Toisen maailmansodan aika; Muu
tr: Avrupa kılıcı tarihi dönemi: Antik/Klasik; Çağdaş/Modern reprodüksiyon; Erken Orta Çağ; Erken Modern Dönem; Yüksek Orta Çağ; Geç Orta Çağ; Kavimler Göçü Dönemi; Napolyon Dönemi; Rönesans; Viktorya Dönemi; Viking Çağı; I. Dünya Savaşı dönemi; II. Dünya Savaşı dönemi; Diğer
pt-PT: período histórico da espada europeia: Antiguidade/clássico; Reprodução contemporânea/moderna; Alta Idade Média; Início da Idade Moderna; Plena Idade Média; Baixa Idade Média; Período de migração; Era napoleónica; Renascimento; Era vitoriana; Era viking; Era da Primeira Guerra Mundial; Era da Segunda Guerra Mundial; Outro
en: European sword historical period: Ancient/Classical; Contemporary/Modern reproduction; Early Medieval; Early Modern; High Medieval; Late Medieval; Migration Period; Napoleonic Era; Renaissance; Victorian Era; Viking Age; World War I era; World War II era; Other
sv: Historisk period för europeiska svärd: Antiken/klassisk; Samtida/modern reproduktion; Tidig medeltid; Tidigmodern tid; Högmedeltid; Senmedeltid; Folkvandringstid; Napoleonkrigen; Renässansen; Viktoriatiden; Vikingatid; Första världskriget; Andra världskriget; Övrigt
bg-BG: Исторически период на европейския меч: Античност/класика; Съвременна/модерна репродукция; Ранно средновековие; Ранна модерна епоха; Същинско средновековие; Късно средновековие; Период на Великото преселение на народите; Наполеонова епоха; Ренесанс; Викторианска епоха; Епоха на викингите; Епоха от Първата световна война; Епоха от Втората световна война; Други
sk-SK: Európske historické obdobie meča: Starovek/antika; Súčasná/moderná reprodukcia; Raný stredovek; Raný novovek; Vrcholný stredovek; Neskorý stredovek; Sťahovanie národov; Napoleonská éra; Renesancia; Viktoriánska éra; Doba vikingov; Obdobie 1. svetovej vojny; Obdobie 2. svetovej vojny; Iné
de: Historische Epoche des europäischen Schwerts: Antike / Klassik; Zeitgenössische/moderne Reproduktion; Frühmittelalter; Frühe Neuzeit; Hochmittelalter; Spätmittelalter; Völkerwanderungszeit; Napoleonische Ära; Renaissance; Viktorianisches Zeitalter; Wikingerzeit; Zeit des Ersten Weltkriegs; Zeit des Zweiten Weltkriegs; Sonstige
zh-TW: 歐洲劍歷史時期: 古代/古典時期; 當代/現代複製品; 中世紀早期; 近代早期; 中世紀中期; 中世紀晚期; 民族大遷徙時期; 拿破崙時代; 文藝復興時期; 維多利亞時代; 維京時代; 第一次世界大戰時期; 第二次世界大戰時期; 其他
el: Ιστορική περίοδος ευρωπαϊκού ξίφους: Αρχαιότητα/Κλασική εποχή; Σύγχρονη/Μοντέρνα αναπαραγωγή; Πρώιμος Μεσαίωνας; Πρώιμη νεότερη περίοδος; Ώριμος Μεσαίωνας; Ύστερος Μεσαίωνας; Περίοδος των Μεγάλων Μεταναστεύσεων; Ναπολεόντεια εποχή; Αναγέννηση; Βικτωριανή εποχή; Εποχή των Βίκινγκ; Εποχή του Α' Παγκοσμίου Πολέμου; Εποχή του Β' Παγκοσμίου Πολέμου; Άλλο
nb: Europeisk sverd historisk periode: Antikken/klassisk tid; Samtids-/moderne reproduksjon; Tidlig middelalder; Tidlig moderne tid; Høymiddelalder; Senmiddelalder; Folkevandringstiden; Napoleonstiden; Renessansen; Viktoriatiden; Vikingtiden; Første verdenskrig; Andre verdenskrig; Annen